Hawaii statutes.
§624-27 Subpoena to witness. Where a
commission to take testimony within the State has been issued from a court
without the State, or where a notice has been given or any other proceeding has
been taken for the purpose of taking testimony within the State, pursuant to
the laws or practice of the state or jurisdiction wherein the deposition is to
be used for purposes of discovery or as evidence, including the United States
if it is a federal proceeding, the circuit court, in a proper case, on the
presentation of a verified petition shall order the issuance of a subpoena to
any witness, commanding the witness to appear before the commissioner, officer
or person named or designated in the commission, notice or other paper, at a
time and place specified in the subpoena, to testify in the same manner as is
provided by the rules of court relating to depositions for use in [the] State.
If any witness fails to obey the subpoena, or refuses to testify, or to produce
a book or paper pursuant to a subpoena or to subscribe the witness' deposition,
the court issuing the subpoena, if it is determined that a contempt has been
committed, may prescribe the punishment as in the case of a recalcitrant
witness in a circuit court in the State, and may make such additional or other
orders as would be proper if the deposition were for use in the State. [L 1951,
c 199, §2; RL 1955, §223-21; HRS §624-27; am L 1972, c 143, §1(e); gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next